Washington statutes.
RCW 9.24.030

Insolvent bank receiving deposit.

Every owner, officer, stockholder, agent or employee of any person, firm, corporation or association engaged, wholly or in part, in the business of banking or receiving money or negotiable paper or securities on deposit or in trust, who shall accept or receive, with or without interest, any deposit, or who shall consent thereto or connive thereat, when he or she knows or has good reason to believe that such person, firm, corporation or association is unsafe or insolvent, is guilty of a class B felony and shall be punished by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not more than ten years, or by a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars.

[ 2003 c 53 s 18; 1992 c 7 s 6; 1909 c 249 s 388; 1893 c 111 s 1; RRS s 2640. Formerly RCW 9.45.140.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Application to mutual savings banks: RCW 32.04.120.

Receiving deposits by bank after insolvency: State Constitution Art. 12 s 12, RCW 30A.44.120.